Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.09, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Discrimination; housing assistance. new text end new text begin A landlord shall not discriminate against a tenant based on the tenant's use of federal, state, or local government rental assistance; a housing choice voucher program; or another form of public assistance that helps a tenant pay rent. A landlord shall not deny a tenant or prospective tenant a viewing of a rental unit or application for a rental unit, deny them the opportunity to rent a unit, or discriminate against a tenant or prospective tenant who uses rental assistance or a housing choice voucher. A landlord shall not advertise that the landlord will not rent to a tenant who uses rental assistance or a housing choice voucher program. new text end